bg-BG: Тип каишка за брадичката: Регулируема; Фиксирана; Няма; Свалящ се; Друго
sk-SK: Typ remienka pod bradu: Nastaviteľný; Pevný; Žiadny; Odnímateľný; Iné
ro-RO: Tipul curelei pentru bărbie: Reglabilă; Fixă; Fără; Detașabil; Altele
lt-LT: Smakro dirželio tipas: Reguliuojamas; Fiksuotas; Nėra; Nuimamas; Kita
hu: Állpánt típusa: Állítható; Fix; Nincs; Levehető; Egyéb
zh-CN: 下颚带类型: 可调节; 固定式; 无; 可拆卸; 其他
sv: Hakremstyp: Justerbar; Fast; Ingen; Avtagbar; Annan
fi: Leukahihnan tyyppi: Säädettävä; Kiinteä; Ei mitään; Irrotettava; Muu
ru: Тип подбородочного ремня: Регулируемый; Фиксированный; Нет; Съемный; Другое
ja: チェーンストラップタイプ: 調節可能; 固定; なし; 着脱式; その他
da: Hageremtype: Justerbar; Fast; Ingen; Aftagelig; Andet
nb: Type hakestropp: Justerbar; Fast; Ingen; Avtakbar; Annen
en: Chin strap type: Adjustable; Fixed; None; Removable; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de correia de queixo: Ajustável; Fixo; Nenhum; Removível; Outro
pt-BR: Tipo de tira de queixo: Ajustável; Fixo; Nenhum; Removível; Outro
tr: Çene bandı tipi: Ayarlanabilir; Sabit; Yok; Çıkarılabilir; Diğer
zh-TW: 下巴帶類型: 可調式; 固定式; 無; 可拆卸; 其他
ko: 턱끈 유형: 조절식; 고정형; 없음; 분리형; 기타
nl: Type kinband: Verstelbaar; Vast; Geen; Afneembaar; Anders
hr-HR: Vrsta remena za bradu: Prilagodljiv; Fiksni; Nijedan; Uklonjiv; Ostalo
fr: Chin strap type: Réglable; Fixe; Aucun; Amovible; Autre
th: ประเภทสายรัดคาง: ปรับได้; ตายตัว; ไม่มี; ถอดออกได้; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de correa de barbilla: Ajustable; Fija; Ninguno; Extraíble; Otro
sl-SI: Vrsta bradnega pasu: Nastavljiv; Fiksno; Brez; Odstranljivo; Drugo
it: Tipo di cinturino per il mento: Regolabile; Fisso; Nessuno; Rimovibile; Altro
el: Τύπος υποσιαγώνιου λουριού: Ρυθμιζόμενος; Σταθερός; Κανένα; Αφαιρούμενο; Άλλο
vi: Loại quai cằm: Có thể điều chỉnh; Cố định; Không có; Tháo rời; Khác
de: Kinnriementyp: Verstellbar; Fixiert; Keine; Abnehmbar; Sonstige
pl: Typ paska podbródkowego: Regulowany; Stały; Brak; Odpinany; Inny
cs: Typ zapínání pod bradou: Nastavitelný; Pevný; Žádný; Odnímatelný; Jiné